Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-367
Nonresident; applicability
of act.

Except as otherwise provided in section
60-366, the provisions of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act relative
to registration and display of registration numbers do not apply to a motor
vehicle or trailer owned by a nonresident of this state, other than a foreign
corporation doing business in this state, if the owner thereof has complied
with the provisions of the law of the foreign country, state, territory, or
federal district of his or her residence relative to registration of motor
vehicles or trailers and the display of registration numbers thereon and conspicuously
displays his or her registration numbers as required thereby.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 67;

Laws 2014, LB851, § 5.